Louisiana, session 2026, HB1022.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:173(A)(1) through (5) and (B) and 3996(B)(48) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 17:173(C)(4) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§173. Behavioral health and primary health services for students
A.(1)(a) A public school governing authority shall not prohibit a behavioral
health provider or primary care provider from providing medically necessary
behavioral health or primary health services authorized by an independent third-party
payor, including but not limited to Medicaid and commercial insurance, to a student
at school during school hours if the student's parent or legal guardian requests such
services from the provider.
(b) The provisions of this Section shall apply to behavioral health services
and primary health services provided on a school campus through a school-based
Page 1 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1450 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1022
health clinic or other provider arrangement; however, nothing in this Section shall
be construed to require any public school governing authority or school to establish
or provide such services.
(2) Each public school governing authority shall adopt and make available
to the public a policy to implement the provisions of this Section. The policy shall
not create onerous requirements for behavioral health providers or primary care
providers resulting in a delay or barrier to the provision of medically necessary
services. The policy, at a minimum, shall provide that:
(a) A Each behavioral health provider who provides behavioral health
services and primary care provider who provides primary health services pursuant
to this Section shall maintain general liability insurance coverage in an amount not
less than one million dollars per occurrence and one million dollars per aggregate
and provide a certificate of insurance naming the public school as the certificate
holder.
(b) No person who has been convicted of or pled nolo contendere to a crime
listed in R.S. 15:587.1(C) shall be permitted to provide behavioral health services or
primary health services to a student at school during school hours. Prior to providing
services as provided in this Section, a each behavioral health provider and primary
care provider shall complete a criminal background check conducted by the
Louisiana State Police and shall pay all related costs. However, applied behavior
analysis providers who are licensed, certified, or registered by the Louisiana
Behavior Analyst Board and primary care providers who are licensed, certified, or
registered by their applicable licensing, certification, or registration board, who
provide documentation of having passed a criminal background check conducted by
the Louisiana State Police, and who are in good standing with the applicable board
shall not be required by a public school governing authority to complete an
additional criminal background check in order to begin providing behavioral health
services or primary health services, as applicable, at a school.
Page 2 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1450 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1022
(c) Behavioral health services and primary health services shall be permitted
during school hours if the student's parent or legal guardian presents a behavioral
health evaluation performed by an evaluator as well as an assessment and authorized
treatment plan performed by a behavioral health provider chosen by the parent or
legal guardian and the evaluation indicates that the services are has requested such
services and a behavioral health provider or primary care provider determines that
evaluation or treatment is necessary during school hours to assist the student with
behavioral health impairments associated with a medical diagnosis that the evaluator
determines are interfering with the student's ability to thrive in the educational
setting or to assist the student with a health condition, illness, or injury requiring
evaluation or treatment.
(d) A behavioral health or primary health evaluation or assessment presented
by the parent or legal guardian of a student shall not be construed as an independent
educational evaluation for purposes of determining if a student meets the criteria
established for eligibility for special education and related services.
(e) A public school governing authority shall not prohibit a behavioral health
or primary health evaluation, assessment, or authorized treatment plan from being
performed on school property in order to establish medical necessity or deliver
medically necessary services. Behavioral health services and primary health services
may be provided during any part of the school day, including any and all
instructional time in English, reading, mathematics, and science. The school
administrator and service provider shall work collaboratively to create a consistent
schedule that meets the medical needs of the student and complies with the provider's
ethical code of conduct. In developing the student's plan, consideration shall include
impacts on a school's operations and a student's testing schedule. If the parties
cannot agree, then the parties shall engage in a dispute resolution process set forth
by the state Department of Education in accordance with Subsection D of this
Section.
Page 3 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1450 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1022
(f)(i) A public school governing authority shall not enter into a contract or
an exclusive agreement with a behavioral health provider that prohibits the parent
or legal guardian from choosing the behavioral health provider for the student.
However the provisions of this Subparagraph Item shall not impair any extant
contract on the effective date of this Section, August 1, 2018, or the renewal thereof.
(ii) A public school governing authority shall not enter into a contract or an
exclusive agreement with a primary care provider that prohibits the parent or legal
guardian from choosing the primary care provider for the student. However the
provisions of this Item shall not impair any extant contract on August 1, 2026, or the
renewal thereof.
(g) The cost of all behavioral health services and primary health services
provided to a student shall be the sole responsibility of the parent or legal guardian,
individually or through an applicable health insurance policy, Medicaid, or other
third-party payor, other than the public school governing authority, that has made
funds available for the payment for the services provided.
(h) While on a school campus, a each behavioral service health provider and
primary care provider shall comply with, and abide by, the terms of any
Individualized Education Plan, Individualized Accommodation Plan, Section 504
Plan, Behavior Management Plan, or Individualized Health Plan applicable to a
student who is a patient of the provider. The services furnished by a provider shall
be incorporated into a written treatment plan applicable to a student.
(i) The parent or legal guardian of a student receiving services from a
behavioral service provider shall be required to execute a "consent to release
information form" between the provider and the public school governing authority.
Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the contrary, a school-based health
center shall not be required to enter into a consent to release information agreement
with a public school governing authority that requires the disclosure of protected
health information. Any information shared by a school-based health center with a
public school governing authority shall be limited to nonclinical information
Page 4 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1450 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1022
necessary for care coordination, student safety, or compliance with applicable law
and shall be subject to all applicable state and federal confidentiality requirements,
including but not limited to the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act
and the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act.
(j) A public school governing authority shall establish reporting requirements
for a behavioral health provider and primary care provider related to the student's
progress and student and school safety concerns as related to the student's
educational program.
(k) A public school governing authority may establish sanctions, including
termination of a provider's authorization to provide services on any school campus,
against a behavioral health provider or primary care provider for failure to comply
with the governing authority's policy.
(l) The determination of the need for a behavioral health or primary health
evaluation and behavioral health or primary health services shall be made by a
behavioral health provider or primary care provider acting within the scope of his
professional license. No school employee who is not licensed to provide healthcare
services shall determine whether a student may receive an evaluation or treatment
by a behavioral health provider or primary care provider.
(3) The failure of a public school governing authority to adopt a policy shall
not be cause to prohibit the provision of behavioral health services or primary health
services to a student as provided in this Section.
(4) Any behavioral health or primary health evaluation, assessment, or
treatment plan administered by a public school governing authority shall not
supercede supersede the behavioral health evaluation, assessment, or treatment plan
provided by an independent behavioral health provider or primary care provider of
a student's parent's choosing.
(5)(a) Any applied behavior analysis services provided by a governing
authority as provided in this Section shall be delivered either by behavioral health
providers licensed, certified, or registered by the Louisiana Behavior Analyst Board
Page 5 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1450 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1022
in accordance with R.S. 37:3701 et seq. or behavioral health providers providing
services in accordance with R.S. 37:3715.
(b) Any primary health services provided by a governing authority as
provided in this Section shall be delivered by primary care providers licensed,
certified, or registered by their applicable health profession licensing board.
* * *
B. For purposes of this Section, the following terms shall have the following
meanings:
(1) "Applied behavior analysis provider" shall mean means a provider who
is licensed, certified, or registered by the Louisiana Behavior Analyst Board and is
in good standing to provide applied behavior analysis services.
(2) "Applied behavior analysis services" shall include means the design,
implementation, and evaluation of systematic instructional and environmental
modifications by an applied behavior analysis provider to produce socially
significant improvements in behavior as described in the Behavior Analyst Practice
Act. provided in Chapter 60 of Title 37 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
(3) "Behavioral health or primary health evaluation" shall include but not be
limited to the following criteria:
(a) Diagnosis.
(b) Type of intervention.
(c) Length of intervention.
(d) Identification of a student's goals.
(e) Identification of impact of student behavior on a student's educational
program.
(f) Recommendations for behavioral health services, including but not
limited to applied behavior analysis services, or primary health services.
(4) "Behavioral health evaluator" means a licensed psychiatrist,
psychologist, medical psychologist, licensed specialist in school psychology,
professional counselor, marriage and family therapist, clinical social worker, or
Page 6 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1450 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1022
applied behavior analysis healthcare provider who is certified by the respective board
of examiners in Louisiana to provide necessary evaluations and who is not an
employee of the public school governing authority or the state Department of
Education.
(4) (5) "Behavioral health provider" shall mean means a provider who is
licensed by the Louisiana Department of Health or a health profession licensing
board and is in good standing to provide behavioral health services in Louisiana
including but not limited to a psychiatrist, psychologist, medical psychologist,
licensed specialist in school psychology, marriage and family therapist, professional
counselor, clinical social worker, applied behavior analysis provider, or a behavioral
health provider organization licensed to provide behavioral health services in
Louisiana.
(5) (6) "Behavioral health services" shall include includes but not be is not
limited to individual psychotherapy, family psychotherapy, psychotropic medication
management, community psychiatric support and treatment, crisis intervention, and
medically necessary applied behavior analysis services.
(6) "Evaluator" shall mean a licensed psychiatrist, psychologist, medical
psychologist, licensed specialist in school psychology, professional counselor,
marriage and family therapist, clinical social worker, or applied behavior analysis
provider who is certified by the respective board of examiners in Louisiana to
provide necessary evaluations and who is not an employee of the public school
governing authority or the state Department of Education.
(7) "Independent third-party payor" means an individual who serves as a
case reviewer for Medicaid or commercial insurers.
(8) "Medically necessary services" means services that meet the following
requirements as determined by the behavioral health provider or primary care
provider, as applicable, or the applicable independent third-party payor:
(a) Provided for the diagnosis, treatment, cure, or relief of a health condition,
illness, injury, or disease.
Page 7 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1450 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1022
(b) Except for clinical trials that are described within the policy, not for
experimental, investigational, or cosmetic purposes.
(c) Within the generally accepted standards of medical care in the
community.
(d) Not solely for the convenience of the insured, the insured's family, or the
provider.
(9) "Primary care provider" means a physician or other healthcare
practitioner who is licensed, certified, registered, or otherwise authorized by law to
perform primary health services consistent with state law.
(10) "Primary health evaluator" means a licensed primary care provider who
is certified by his applicable health profession licensing board to provide necessary
evaluations and who is not an employee of the public school governing authority or
the state Department of Education.
(11) "Primary health services" means routine healthcare services, including
screening, assessment, diagnosis, treatment for promotion of health, and detection
and management of disease or injury.
C. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to supersede any of the
following:
* * *
(4) Any law pertaining to the licensure, certification, or registration of a
primary care provider by the applicable health professional licensing board or the
practice of any primary care provider or any regulation promulgated by the Louisiana
Department of Health pursuant to any such law.
* * *
§3996. Charter schools; exemptions; requirements
* * *
B. Notwithstanding any state law, rule, or regulation to the contrary and
except as may be otherwise specifically provided for in an approved charter, a
charter school established and operated in accordance with the provisions of this
Page 8 of 11
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1450 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1022
Chapter and its approved charter and the school's officers and employees shall be
exempt from all statutory mandates or other statutory requirements that are
applicable to public schools and to public school officers and employees except for
the following laws otherwise applicable to public schools with the same grades:
* * *
(48) Behavioral health and primary health services for students, R.S. 17:173.
* * *
Section 2. The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education, in consultation
with the Louisiana Department of Health, the Louisiana State Board of Medical Examiners,
and the Louisiana State Board of Nursing, shall promulgate rules in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act for the implementation of R.S. 17:173 as amended and
reenacted by Section 1 of this Act.